th: โทโพโลยี UPS: เดลต้าคอนเวอร์ชัน; เฟอร์โรเรโซแนนต์; ไลน์อินเทอร์แอคทีฟ; ออนไลน์ / ดับเบิลคอนเวอร์ชัน; สแตนด์บาย / ออฟไลน์; อื่นๆ
da: UPS-topologi: Delta konvertering; Ferroresonant; Line-interactive; Online / dobbeltkonvertering; Standby / offline; Andet
hu: UPS-topológia: Delta átalakítás; Ferrorezonáns; Vonali-interaktív; Online / dupla átalakítás; Készenléti / offline; Egyéb
cs: Topologie UPS: Delta konverze; Ferorezonanční; Line-interactive; Online / dvojitá konverze; Pohotovostní / offline; Jiné
fr: Topologie UPS: Conversion delta; Ferrorésonant; Interactif de ligne; En ligne / double conversion; Veille / hors ligne; Autre
sl-SI: Topologija UPS: Delta pretvorba; Feroresonančni; Linijsko interaktivni; Spletni / dvojna pretvorba; V pripravljenosti / brez povezave; Drugo
bg-BG: UPS топология: Делта преобразуване; Ферорезонансна; Линейно-интерактивна; Онлайн / двойно преобразуване; В готовност / офлайн; Други
sk-SK: Topológia UPS: Delta konverzia; Ferorezonančná; Line-interactive; Online / dvojitá konverzia; Pohotovostná / offline; Iné
nl: UPS-topologie: Delta-conversie; Ferroresonant; Line-interactief; Online / dubbele conversie; Standby / offline; Andere
lt-LT: UPS topologija: Delta konversija; Ferorezonansinis; Linijinis interaktyvus; Internetinis / dvigubos konversijos; Budėjimo režimas / neprisijungus; Kita
es: Topología del UPS: Conversión delta; Ferrorresonante; Interactivo de línea; En línea / doble conversión; En espera / fuera de línea; Otros
ko: UPS 토폴로지: 델타 변환; 철공진; 라인 인터랙티브; 온라인 / 이중 변환; 대기 / 오프라인; 기타
ro-RO: Topologie UPS: Conversie delta; Ferorezonant; Linie interactivă; Online / conversie dublă; Standby / offline; Altele
pl: Topologia UPS: Konwersja delta; Ferrorezonansowy; Line-interactive; Online / podwójna konwersja; Standby / offline; Inne
el: Τοπολογία UPS: Μετατροπής delta; Σιδηροσυντονισμού; Αλληλεπιδραστικό; Online / διπλής μετατροπής; Αναμονής / Offline; Άλλο
pt-PT: Topologia da UPS: Conversão delta; Ferrorressonante; Linha interativa; Online / dupla conversão; Standby / offline; Outro
sv: UPS-topologi: Deltakonvertering; Ferroresonant; Linjeinteraktiv; Online / dubbelkonvertering; Standby / offline; Övrigt
hr-HR: Topologija UPS-a: Delta konverzija; Ferorezonantna; Linijski interaktivna; Online / dvostruka konverzija; Standby / offline; Ostalo
fi: UPS-topologia: Delta-muunnos; Ferroresonantti; Linja-interaktiivinen; Online / kaksoismuunnos; Valmiustila / offline; Muu
ja: UPSトポロジー: デルタ変換; フェロレゾナント; ラインインタラクティブ; オンライン / ダブルコンバージョン; スタンバイ / オフライン; その他
zh-TW: UPS 拓撲: Delta 轉換式; 鐵磁共振式; 在線互動式; 在線式 / 雙轉換式; 待機式 / 離線式; 其他
pt-BR: Topologia do UPS: Conversão delta; Ferrorressonante; Linha interativa; Online / dupla conversão; Standby / offline; Outro
ru: Топология ИБП: Дельта-преобразование; Феррорезонансный; Линейно-интерактивный; Онлайн / двойное преобразование; Резервный / офлайн; Другой
de: USV-Topologie: Delta-Konversion; Ferroresonant; Line-Interactive; Online / Doppelkonversion; Standby / Offline; Sonstiges
nb: UPS-topologi: Deltakonvertering; Ferroresonant; Linjeinteraktiv; Online / dobbeltkonvertering; Standby / offline; Annet
en: UPS topology: Delta conversion; Ferroresonant; Line-interactive; Online / Double-conversion; Standby / Offline; Other
zh-CN: UPS 拓扑结构: Delta 转换; 铁磁谐振; 在线互动式; 在线式/双转换; 备用式/离线式; 其他
it: Topologia UPS: Conversione delta; Ferrorisonante; Line-interactive; Online / doppia conversione; Standby / offline; Altro
tr: UPS topolojisi: Delta dönüşüm; Ferrorezonant; Hat etkileşimli; Çevrimiçi / Çift dönüşüm; Bekleme / Çevrimdışı; Diğer
vi: Cấu trúc liên kết UPS: Chuyển đổi delta; Cộng hưởng từ sắt; Tương tác đường dây; Trực tuyến / chuyển đổi kép; Dự phòng / ngoại tuyến; Khác